Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5606
Insurer; prohibited acts; copy of statement of financial condition; obtain.

(1) An insurer shall not engage the services of any person, firm, association, or corporation to act as a reinsurance intermediary-broker on its behalf unless such person, firm, association, or corporation is licensed as required by subsection (1) of section 44-5603.

(2) An insurer may not employ a person who is employed by a reinsurance intermediary-broker with which it transacts business unless such reinsurance intermediary-broker is under common control with the insurer and subject to the Insurance Holding Company System Act.

(3) An insurer shall annually obtain a copy of statements of the financial condition of each reinsurance intermediary-broker with which it transacts business.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 60.

Insurance Holding Company System Act, see section 44-2120.